src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-aigi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - aigi: # adjectives 196 'eng /est aegne/fin' - full paradigm
     aigi+A+Sg+Nom: aigi
     aigi+A+Sg+Gen: āigiz
     aigi+A+Sg+Par: āigizt
     aigi+A+Sg+Dat: āigizõn
     aigi+A+Sg+Ins: āigizõks
     aigi+A+Sg+Ill: āigizõ
     aigi+A+Sg+Ela: āigizõst
     aigi+A+Pl+Nom: aigizt
     aigi+A+Pl+Gen: aigizt
     aigi+A+Pl+Par: āigiži
     aigi+A+Pl+Dat: aigiztõn
     aigi+A+Pl+Ins: aigiztõks
     aigi+A+Pl+Ill: āigižiz
     aigi+A+Pl+Ela: āigižist
